Utah statutes.
48-1d-909.   Court proceedings.

(1)  A dissolved limited liability partnership that has published a notice under Section 48-1d-908 may file an application with the district court in the county where the dissolved limited liability partnership's principal office is located or, if the principal office is not located in this state, where the office of its registered agent is located, for a determination of the amount and form of security to be provided for payment of claims that are contingent, have not been made known to the dissolved limited liability partnership, or are based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution but which, based on the facts known to the dissolved limited liability partnership, are reasonably expected to arise after the effective date of dissolution.  Security is not required for any claim that is or is reasonably anticipated to be barred under Subsection 48-1d-907(3).

(2)  Not later than 10 days after the filing of an application under Subsection (1), the dissolved limited liability partnership shall give notice of the proceeding to each claimant holding a contingent claim known to the dissolved limited liability partnership.

(3)  In any proceeding under this section, the district court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent all claimants whose identities are unknown.  The reasonable fees and expenses of the guardian, including all reasonable expert witness fees, must be paid by the dissolved limited liability partnership.

(4)  A dissolved limited liability partnership that provides security in the amount and form ordered by the district court under Subsection (1) satisfies the dissolved limited liability partnership's obligations with respect to claims that are contingent, have not been made known to the dissolved limited liability partnership, or are based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution, and the claims may not be enforced against a partner or transferee who receives assets in liquidation.

(5)  This section applies only to a debt, obligation, or other liability incurred while a partnership was a limited liability partnership.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

